Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 3. DEPARTMENT FUNDS, FEES, AND TAXES

SUBTITLE A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 203. GENERAL PROVISIONS RELATING TO TAXES

Sec. 203.001. LIMITATION ON CERTAIN ADDITIONAL TAXES. (a) This section applies to:

(1) an insurer authorized to engage in the business of insurance in this state other than an eligible surplus lines insurer; and

(2) a health maintenance organization authorized to engage in the business of a health maintenance organization in this state.

(b) Except as otherwise provided by this code or the Labor Code, an insurer or health maintenance organization subject to a tax imposed by Chapter 4, 221, 222, 223A, 224, or 257 may not be required to pay any additional tax imposed by this state or a county or municipality in proportion to the insurer's or health maintenance organization's gross premium receipts.

(c) Subsection (b) does not:

(1) limit the applicability of other taxes, fees, and assessments imposed by this code; or

(2) prohibit the imposition and collection of state, county, and municipal taxes on the property of insurers or health maintenance organizations or state, county, and municipal taxes imposed by other laws of this state, unless a specific exemption for insurers or health maintenance organizations is provided in those laws.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 569 (S.B. 734), Sec. 3, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 203.002. TAX PAYMENT REQUIRED FOR CERTAIN CERTIFICATES; UNREPORTED GROSS PREMIUM RECEIPTS. (a) A Life Insurance Company May not receive a certificate of authority to engage in the business of insurance in this state until all taxes imposed under this code or another insurance law of this state are paid.

(b) If the commissioner determines by examining a company or by other means that the company's gross premium receipts in a year exceed the amount reported by the company for that year, the commissioner shall report that determination to the comptroller. The comptroller shall institute a collection action as the comptroller considers appropriate to collect taxes due on unreported gross premium receipts.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 2005.